Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.010

Intent.

The legislature finds and declares that small and moderate-size companies can enhance their access to working capital and to capital for acquiring and equipping commercial and industrial facilities by using the United States small business administration national small business loan program known as the 7(a) loan guaranty program. The 7(a) loan guaranty program provides financing to small firms needing working capital and longer term financing for equipment and other fixed assets. Such loans can be made to small businesses by nondepository lenders and guaranteed by the small business administration only if the state provides for the ongoing regulation and examination of such entities.

It is the intent of the legislature that the director of financial institutions [license], regulate, and subject to ongoing examination, nondepository lenders for the purpose of allowing such lenders to participate in the small business administration's 7(a) loan guaranty program.

[ 1994 c 92 s 261; 1989 c 212 s 1.]